Nebraska, session 109, LB321.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB321 LB321
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 31-735, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
31-735 (1) On the first Tuesday after the second Monday in September
which is at least fifteen months after the judgment of the district court
creating a sanitary and improvement district and on the first Tuesday
after the second Monday in September each two years thereafter, the board
of trustees shall cause a special election to be held, at which election
a board of trustees shall be elected. The board of trustees shall have
five members except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Each
member elected to the board of trustees shall be elected to a term of two
years and shall hold office until such member's successor is elected and
qualified. Any person desiring to file for the office of trustee may file
for such office with the election commissioner, or county clerk in
counties having no election commissioner, of the county in which the
greater proportion in area of the district is located not later than
fifty days before the election. If such person will serve on the board of
trustees as a designated representative of a limited partnership, general
partnership, limited liability company, public, private, or municipal
corporation, estate, or trust which owns real estate in the district, the
filing shall indicate that fact and shall include appropriate
documentation evidencing such fact. No filing fee shall be required. A
person filing for the office of trustee to be elected at the election
held four years after the first election of trustees and each election
thereafter shall designate whether such person is a candidate for
election by the resident owners of such district or a candidate for
election by all of the owners of real estate located in the district. If
a person filing for the office of trustee is a designated representative
of a limited partnership, a general partnership, a limited liability
company, a public, private, or municipal corporation, an estate, or a
trust which owns real estate in the district, the name of such entity
shall accompany the name of the candidate on the ballot in the following
-2-

LB321 LB321
2025 2025
form: (Name of candidate) to represent (name of entity) as a member of
the board. The name of each candidate shall appear on only one ballot.
The name of a person may be written in and voted for as a candidate
for the office of trustee, and such write-in candidate may be elected to
the office of trustee. A write-in candidate for the office of trustee who
will serve as a designated representative of a limited partnership, a
general partnership, a limited liability company, a public, private, or
municipal corporation, an estate, or a trust which owns real estate in
the district shall not be elected to the office of trustee unless (a)
each vote is accompanied by the name of the entity which the candidate
will represent and (b) within ten days after the date of the election the
candidate provides the election commissioner or county clerk with
appropriate documentation evidencing the candidate's representation of
the entity. Votes cast which do not carry such accompanying designation
shall not be counted.
A trustee shall be an owner of real estate located in the district
or shall be a person designated to serve as a representative on the board
of trustees if the real estate is owned by a limited partnership, a
general partnership, a limited liability company, a public, private, or
municipal corporation, an estate, or a trust. Notice of the date of the
election shall be mailed by the clerk of the district not later than
sixty-five days prior to the election to each person who is entitled to
vote at the election for trustees whose property ownership or lease
giving a right to vote is of record on the records of the register of
deeds as of a date designated by the election commissioner or county
clerk, which date shall be not more than eighty days prior to the
election.
(2)(a) For any sanitary and improvement district, a person whose
ownership or right to vote becomes of record or is received after the
date specified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may vote when
such person establishes the right to vote to the satisfaction of the
-3-

LB321 LB321
2025 2025
election board. At the first election and at the election held two years
after the first election, any person may cast one vote for each trustee
for each acre of unplatted land or fraction thereof and one vote for each
platted lot which such person may own in the district.
(b) This subdivision applies to a district until the board of
trustees amends its articles of association pursuant to subdivision (2)
(d) of this section. At the elections election held four years and six
years after the first election of trustees, two members of the board of
trustees shall be elected by the legal property owners resident within
such sanitary and improvement district and three members shall be elected
by all of the owners of real estate located in the district pursuant to
this section. Every resident property owner may cast one vote for a
candidate for each office of trustee to be filled by election of resident
property owners only. Such resident property owners may also each cast
one vote for each acre of unplatted land or fraction thereof and for each
platted lot owned within the district for a candidate for each office of
trustee to be filled by election of all property owners. For each office
of trustee to be filled by election of all property owners of the
district, every legal property owner not resident within such sanitary
and improvement district may cast one vote for each acre of unplatted
land or fraction thereof and one vote for each platted lot which such
legal property owner owns in the district. At the election held eight six
years after the first election of trustees and at each election
thereafter, three members of the board of trustees shall be elected by
the legal property owners resident within such sanitary and improvement
district and two members shall be elected by all of the owners of real
estate located in the district pursuant to this section. If there are not
any legal property owners resident within such district or if not less
than ninety percent of the area of the district is owned for other than
residential uses, the five members shall be elected by the legal property
owners of all property within such district as provided in this section.
-4-

LB321 LB321
2025 2025
(c) Any public, private, or municipal corporation owning any land or
lot in the district may vote at an election the same as an individual. If
more than fifty percent of the homes in any sanitary and improvement
district are used as a second, seasonal, or recreational residence, the
owners of such property shall be considered legal property owners
resident within such district for purposes of electing trustees. For
purposes of voting for trustees, each condominium apartment under a
condominium property regime established prior to January 1, 1984, under
the Condominium Property Act or established after January 1, 1984, under
the Nebraska Condominium Act shall be deemed to be a platted lot and the
lessee or the owner of the lessee's interest, under any lease for an
initial term of not less than twenty years which requires the lessee to
pay taxes and special assessments levied on the leased property, shall be
deemed to be the owner of the property so leased and entitled to cast the
vote of such property. When ownership of a platted lot or unplatted land
is held jointly by two or more persons, whether as joint tenants, tenants
in common, limited partners, members of a limited liability company, or
any other form of joint ownership, only one person shall be entitled to
cast the vote of such property. The executor, administrator, guardian, or
trustee of any person or estate interested shall have the right to vote.
No corporation, estate, or irrevocable trust shall be deemed to be a
resident owner for purposes of voting for trustees. Should two or more
persons or officials claim the right to vote on the same tract, the
election board shall determine the party entitled to vote. Such board
shall select one of their number chairperson and one of their number
clerk. In case of a vacancy on such board, the remaining trustees shall
fill the vacancy on such board until the next election.
(d) For any sanitary and improvement district which has been in
existence for at least ten years, which has less than seventy property
owners entitled to vote for trustees, which has at least two resident
property owners, and in which less than ten percent of the area of the
-5-

LB321 LB321
2025 2025
district is owned for other than residential uses, the board of trustees
may amend its articles of association as provided in section 31-740.01 to
provide for a reduction in the number of trustees on the board from five
members to three members to be effective at the beginning of the term of
office for the board of trustees elected at the next election. At the
next election and at each election thereafter, two members of the board
of trustees shall be elected by the legal property owners resident within
such sanitary and improvement district and one member shall be elected by
all of the owners of real estate located in the district pursuant to this
section. Every resident property owner may cast one vote for a candidate
for each office of trustee to be filled by election of resident property
owners only. Such resident property owners may also each cast one vote
for each acre of unplatted land or fraction thereof and for each platted
lot owned within the district for a candidate for the office of trustee
to be filled by election of all property owners. For the office of
trustee to be filled by election of all property owners of the district,
every legal property owner not resident within such sanitary and
improvement district may cast one vote for each acre of unplatted land or
fraction thereof and one vote for each platted lot which such legal
property owner owns in the district.
(3) The election commissioner or county clerk shall hold any
election required by subsection (1) of this section by sealed mail ballot
by notifying the board of trustees on or before July 1 of a given year.
The election commissioner or county clerk shall, at least twenty days
prior to the election, mail a ballot and return envelope to each person
who is entitled to vote at the election and whose property ownership or
lease giving a right to vote is of record with the register of deeds as
of the date designated by the election commissioner or county clerk,
which date shall not be more than eighty days prior to the election. The
ballot and return envelope shall include: (a) The names and addresses of
the candidates; (b) room for write-in candidates; and (c) instructions on
-6-

LB321 LB321
2025 2025
how to vote and return the ballot. Such ballots shall be returned in the
return envelope to the election commissioner or county clerk no later
than 5 p.m. on the date set for the election. If the ballot is not
returned in the return envelope, such ballot shall not be counted. If
more than one ballot is included in the same return envelope, such
ballots shall not be counted and shall be reinserted into the return
envelope which shall be resealed and marked rejected.
Sec. 2. Original section 31-735, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-7-